Washington statutes.
RCW 36.33.200

Election reserve fund.

The board of county commissioners may establish an election reserve fund for the payment of expenses of conducting regular and special state and county elections and compensation of election and registration officers and annually budget and levy a tax therefor. It may also make transfers into the election reserve fund from the current expense fund and receive funds for such purposes from cities, school districts and other subdivisions.

[ 1963 c 4 s 36.33.200. Prior: 1955 c 48 s 1.]